Hawaii statutes.
[§554B-12] Liability to third persons.
(a) A claim based on a contract entered into by a custodial trustee acting in
a fiduciary capacity, an obligation arising from the ownership or control of
custodial trust property, or a tort committed in the course of administering
the custodial trust may be asserted against the custodial trust property by
proceeding against the custodial trustee in the fiduciary capacity, whether or
not the custodial trustee or the beneficiary is personally liable.

(b) A custodial trustee is not personally
liable:

(1) On a contract properly entered into in a
fiduciary capacity unless the custodial trustee fails to reveal that capacity
and to identify the custodial trust in the contract; or

(2) For an obligation arising from control of
custodial trust property or for a tort committed in the course of the
administration of the custodial trust unless the custodial trustee is
personally at fault.

(c) A beneficiary is not personally liable for
an obligation arising from ownership of custodial trust property or for a tort
committed in the course of administration of the custodial trust unless the
beneficiary is personally in possession of the custodial trust property giving
rise to the liability or is personally at fault.

(d) Neither subsection (b) or (c) precludes
any proceeding to establish liability of the custodial trustee or beneficiary
to the extent that either is protected as the insured by liability insurance.
[L 1989, c 76, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next